Missouri, session 2026, HB2344.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.449, to read as follows:
67.449. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", as defined in section 455.010;
(2) "Emergency", a sudden or unforeseen situation in which property or human
life is in jeopardy that requires immediate action and the prompt summoning of aid;
(3) "Penalize", includes, but is not limited to, the actual or threatened
revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of a rental license; the actual or threatened
assessment of fines; or the actual or threatened eviction or causing the actual or
threatened eviction of a tenant from leased premises;
(4) "Premises", any parcel of property, whether residential or commercial; a
building or structure, if any, situated on the property; and any portion of the public way
that abuts the property if the public way is used in conjunction with the abutting
property for the commission of illegal activity;
(5) "Public nuisance", a continuing act or physical condition that is made,
permitted, allowed, or continued by any person or legal entity, a person's or legal
entity's agent or servant, or any person or legal entity who aids therein, and that is
detrimental to the safety, welfare, or convenience of the inhabitants of a political
subdivision, or any act or condition so designated by statute or ordinance;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2344 2
(6) "Victim of a crime", a person who suffers personal physical injury or death
as a direct result of a crime.
2. Requests to law enforcement or emergency services for assistance shall not be
considered a public nuisance.
3. (1) No political subdivision shall penalize a resident, tenant, or landlord for a
request to law enforcement or emergency services by or on behalf of a victim of abuse, a
victim of a crime, or an individual in an emergency if the contact was made with the
reasonable belief that intervention or emergency assistance was necessary to prevent the
perpetration or escalation of, or to respond to, such abuse, crime, or emergency or if the
intervention or emergency assistance was actually needed in response to such abuse,
crime, or emergency.
(2) If a political subdivision enforces or attempts to enforce an ordinance against
a resident, tenant, or landlord in violation of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the
resident, tenant, or landlord may bring a civil action for a violation of this section and
seek an order from a court of competent jurisdiction for any of the following remedies:
(a) An order requiring the political subdivision to cease and desist the unlawful
practice;
(b) Payment of compensatory damages, provided that a resident, tenant, or
landlord shall make a reasonable effort to mitigate any damages;
(c) Payment of reasonable attorney's fees;
(d) Payment of court costs; and
(e) Other equitable relief including, but not limited to, reinstating a rental license
or rental permit, as the court may deem appropriate.
✔